Connecticut, session 2026, HB05108.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
twenty million dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the
Department of Economic and Community Development for the purpose
of providing grants-in-aid to municipalities for commercial facade
improvements.